Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2318
Nurse practitioner; temporary license; requirements; military spouse; temporary license.

(1)(a) The department may grant a temporary license to practice as a nurse practitioner for up to one hundred twenty days upon application:

(i) To graduates of an approved nurse practitioner program pending results of the first credentialing examination following graduation;

(ii) To a nurse practitioner lawfully authorized to practice in another state pending completion of the application for a Nebraska license; and

(iii) To applicants for purposes of a reentry program or supervised practice as part of continuing competency activities established by the board.

(b) A temporary license issued pursuant to this subsection may be extended for up to one year with the approval of the board.

(2) An applicant who is a military spouse may apply for a temporary license as provided in section 38-129.01.

Laws 1984, LB 724, § 22;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 72;

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 37;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 53;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 59;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 66;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1724.01;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 11;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 810;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 79.